vi: Loại phim dán cửa sổ: Chống chói; Chống vẽ bậy; Mất điện; Trang trí; Kính khắc axit; Mờ đục; Loại bỏ nhiệt; Cách nhiệt; Gương; Gương một chiều; Có hoa văn; Riêng tư; Phản chiếu; An toàn; An toàn; Kiểm soát năng lượng mặt trời; Kính màu; Độ bám tĩnh; Chống tia cực tím; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul de folie de geam: Antireflex; Anti-graffiti; Opacizant; Decorativ; Sticlă gravată; Mat; Respingerea căldurii; Izolant; Oglindă; Oglindă unidirecțională; Cu model; Intimitate; Reflectorizant; De siguranță; Pentru securitate; Control solar; Vitraliu; Electrostatic; Blocarea UV; Altele
nb: Type vindusfilm: Antirefleks; Anti-graffiti; Blackout; Dekorativ; Etset glass; Frostet; Varmeavvisning; Isolerende; Speil; Enveisspeil; Mønstret; Personvern; Reflekterende; Sikkerhet; Sikkerhet; Solkontroll; Farget glass; Statisk klamring; UV-blokkering; Annet
bg-BG: Вид фолио за прозорци: Защита от отблясъци; Антиграфити; Затъмнение; Декоративно; Гравирано стъкло; Матирано; Отблъскване на топлината; Изолиране; Огледало; Еднопосочно огледало; На шарки; Уединение; Светлоотразително; Безопасност; Защита; Слънчев контрол; Витраж; Статично прилепване; UV блокиране; Друго
en: Window film type: Anti-glare; Anti-graffiti; Blackout; Decorative; Etched glass; Frosted; Heat rejection; Insulating; Mirror; One-way mirror; Patterned; Privacy; Reflective; Safety; Security; Solar control; Stained glass; Static cling; UV blocking; Other
pl: Rodzaj folii okiennej: Antyodblaskowe; Antygraffiti; Zaciemniające; Dekoracyjne; Efekt szkła trawionego; Matowe; Redukcja ciepła; Izolacyjne; Lustrzane; Lustro weneckie; Wzorzyste; Zapewniające prywatność; Odblaskowe; Ochronne; Antywłamaniowe; Kontrola słoneczna; Witraż; Statyczna; Blokowanie promieniowania UV; Inne
de: Fensterfolienart: Blendfrei; Anti-Graffiti; Blackout; Dekorativ; Geätztes Glas; Mattiert; Wärmeabfuhr; Isolierend; Spiegel; Einwegspiegel; Gemustert; Privatsphäre; Reflektierend; Sicherheitsrasierer; Sicherheit; Solarkontrolle; Buntglas; Statische Haftung; UV-Blockierung; Sonstiges
fi: Ikkunakalvon tyyppi: Häikäisysuojattu; Graffitien esto; Pimennys; Koristeellinen; Etsattu lasi; Himmeä; Lämmön hylkiminen; Eristävä; Peili; Yksisuuntainen peili; Kuviollinen; Yksityisyyttä suojaava; Heijastava; Suojaus; Turvallisuus; Auringonsuojakalvo; Lasimaalaus; Staattinen kiinnitys; UV-suoja; Muu
da: Vinduesfilmtype: Anti-genskin; Anti-graffiti; Blackout; Dekorativ; Ætset glas; Frost; Varmeafvisning; Isolering; Spejl; Envejsspejl; Mønstret; Privatliv; Reflekterende; Tryghed; Sikkerhed; Solstyring; Farvet glas; Statisk klæben; UV-blokering; Andet
nl: Raamfolietype: Ontspiegeld; Anti-graffiti; Blackout; Decoratief; Geëtst glas; Berijpt; Warmtewerend; Isoleren; Spiegel; Eenrichtingsspiegel; Met patroon; Privacy; Reflecterend; Veiligheid; Beveiliging; Zonwerend; Glas-in-lood; Statische hechting; UV-werend; Overig
lt-LT: Langų plėvelės tipas: Apsauga nuo akinimo; Apsauga nuo grafičių; Šviesai nepralaidi; Dekoratyvinė; Graviruotas stiklas; Matinė; Šilumos atmetimas; Pašiltinta; Veidrodinė; Vienpusis veidrodis; Raštuota; Privatumo suteikianti; Atspindinti šviesą; Saugos; Apsauginė; Saulės kontrolė; Vitražas; Statinis sukibimas; UV blokavimas; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta folije za prozore: Protiv odsjaja; Protiv grafita; Zamračenje; Ukrasni; Ugravirano staklo; Zamrznuto; Odbijanje topline; Izolacija; Ogledalo; Jednosmjerno ogledalo; S uzorkom; Privatnost; Reflektirajuće; Sigurnosna; Zaštitna; Solarna kontrola; Vitraž; Statičko prianjanje; Zaštita od UV zračenja; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta okenske folije: Proti bleščanju; Proti grafitom; Zatemnitev; Dekorativna; Jedkano steklo; Zamrznjeno; Odvzem toplote; Izolacija; Zrcalno; Enosmerno ogledalo; Vzorčast; Z zaklepanjem; Odsevno; Varnostna; Varnostna; Sončna regulacija; Vitraž; Statični oprijem; UV-blokiranje; Druga
hu: Ablakfólia típusa: Csillogásmentes; Graffiti elleni védelem; Sötétítő; Díszítő; Maratott üveg; Matt; Hőelvonás; Szigetelő; Tükör; Egyirányú tükör; Mintás; Belátásgátló; Fényvisszaverő; Biztonsági; Biztonság; Napvédelem; Ólomüveg; Statikus tapadás; UV-blokkolás; Egyéb
it: Tipo di pellicola per finestre: Antiabbagliante; Anti-graffiti; Blackout; Decorativo; vetro acidato; Smerigliato; Rifiuto del calore; Isolante; Specchio; Specchio unidirezionale; A fantasia; Privacy; Riflettente; Sicurezza; Sicurezza; Controllo solare; Vetrate; Aderenza statica; Blocco UV; Altro
th: ประเภทของฟิล์มกรองแสง: ป้องกันการสะท้อน; ป้องกันการพ่นสี/ขีดเขียนทำลาย; ม่านกันแสงแบบมืดทึบ; ตกแต่ง; กระจกฝ้าเอฟเฟกต์สลักลาย; ฝ้า; ลดการส่งผ่านความร้อน; ฉนวนกัน; กระจก; มองได้ทางเดียว; มีลวดลาย; ลูกบิดประตูล็อกจากด้านใน; สะท้อนแสง; ความปลอดภัย; รักษาความปลอดภัย; ควบคุมความร้อนจากแสงอาทิตย์; กระจกสี; แบบยึดเกาะเหนียวแน่น; ป้องกันรังสียูวี; อื่นๆ
ko: 창문 필름 유형: 눈부심 방지; 낙서 방지; 정전; 장식적인; 에칭 유리; 서리; 열 방출; 단열; 거울; 일방향 거울; 패턴이 있는; 프라이버시; 반사; 안전; 보안; 태양광 제어; 스테인드글라스; 정전기 부착; 자외선 차단; 기타
zh-CN: 窗膜类型: 防眩光; 防涂鸦; 遮光; 装饰性; 蚀刻玻璃效果; 磨砂; 散热; 隔热; 镜面; 单向控制; 带图案; 隐私; 反光; 安全; 防盗; 阳光控制; 彩绘玻璃效果; 静电吸附; 防紫外线; 其他
zh-TW: 窗貼類型: 抗眩光; 抗塗鴉; 停電; 裝飾; 蝕刻玻璃; 磨砂; 隔熱; 隔熱; 鏡面; 單向鏡膜; 圖案; 隱私; 反光; 安全; 安全; 日照調節; 彩色玻璃; 靜電吸附; 紫外線阻擋; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de película para janelas: Antirreflexo; Antigrafite; Blackout; Decorativo; Vidro gravado; Fosco; Rejeição de calor; Isolante; Espelho; Espelho unidirecional; Com padrão; Privacidade; Refletivo; De segurança; Segurança; Controle solar; Vitrais; Aderência estática; Bloqueio de raios UV; Outro
sk-SK: Typ okennej fólie: Antireflexný; Proti grafiti; Zatemňovací; Dekoratívny; Leptané sklo; Matný; Odvod tepla; Izolačný; Zrkadlový; Jednosmerné zrkadlo; Vzorovaný; Diskrétny; Reflexný; Bezpečnostný; Bezpečnosť; Solárna regulácia; Vitráže; Statické priľnutie; Blokovanie UV žiarenia; Iné
fr: Type de film pour fenêtre: Anti-reflet; Anti-graffiti; Coupure électrique; Décoratif; Effet verre dépoli; Givré; Rejet de chaleur; Isolant; Miroir; Miroir sans tain; A motifs; Confidentialité; Réfléchissant; De sûreté; Sécurité; Contrôle solaire; Vitrail; Adhérence statique; Blocage UV; Autre
ru: Тип оконной пленки: Антибликовая; С защитой от граффити; Светонепроницаемая; Декоративная; Матовое стекло; Матовая; Отвод тепла; Теплоизоляционная; Зеркальная; Одностороннее зеркало; С узорами; Для приватности; Отражающая; Для защиты от осколков; Антивандальная; Контроль солнечного излучения; Витраж; Статическая; Блокировка УФ-излучения; Другая
es: Tipo de película para ventanas: Antirreflejo; Antigrafiti; Blackout; Decorativo; Vidrio grabado; Escarchado; Rechazo de calor; Aislante; Espejo; Espejo unidireccional; Estampados; Privacidad; Reflectante; Seguridad; Seguridad; Control solar; Vidrieras; Adhesivo estático; Bloqueo de rayos UV; Otros
sv: Typ av fönsterfilm: Reflexskydd; Anti-graffiti; Mörkläggare; Dekorativ; Etsat glas; Frostad; Värmeavvisning; Isolerande; Spegel; Envägsspegel; Mönstrad; Integritet; Reflekterande; Säkerhet; Säkerhet; Solskydd; Målat glas; Statiskt fäste; UV-blockering; Annat
ja: ウィンドウフィルムの種類: 反射防止; 落書き防止; ブラックアウト; 装飾; エッチングガラス; フロスト; 熱遮断; 断熱; ミラー; マジックミラー; 模様入り; プライバシー保護; 反射; 飛散防止; 防犯; 太陽光制御; ステンドグラス; 静電粘着; UVカット; その他
cs: Typ okenní fólie: Proti odleskům; Anti-graffiti; Zatemňovací; Dekorativní; Leptané sklo; Matné/mléčné; Termoizolační; Izolační; Zrcadlové; Jednosměrné zrcadlo; Vzorované; Pro zajištění pocitu soukromí; Reflexní; Ochranné; Bezpečnostní; Protisluneční fólie; Vitráž; Statické přilnavé; Zadržuje UV záření; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de película para vidros: Antibrilho; Antigraffiti; Blackout; Decorativo; Vidro gravado; Fosco; Rejeição de calor; Isolante; Espelhado; Espelho unidirecional; Estampado; Privacidade; Refletor; Segurança; Segurança; Controlo solar; Vitrais; Aderência estática; Bloqueio dos raios UV; Outro
tr: Pencere filmi türü: Yansıma önleyici; Grafiti önleyici; Karartma; Dekoratif; Oyma cam; Buzlu; Isı yansıtıcı; Yalıtımlı; Aynalı; Tek yönlü ayna; Desenli; Mahremiyet; Yansıtıcı; Emniyet; Güvenlik; Güneş kontrolü; Vitray; Statik yapışan; UV korumalı; Diğer
el: Τύπος μεμβράνης παραθύρων: Αντιθαμβωτική; Αντι-γκράφιτι; Συσκότισης; Διακοσμητική; Χαραγμένο γυαλί; Με εφέ αμμοβολής; Απόρριψη θερμότητας; Μονωτική; Καθρέφτης; Μονόδρομος καθρέφτης; Με μοτίβα; Για ιδιωτικότητα; Ανακλαστική; Ασφαλείας; Για ασφάλεια; Ηλιακός έλεγχος; Υαλογράφημα; Στατικού ηλεκτρισμού; Αποκλεισμός UV; Άλλο